Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.165

Enforcement of fine.

Where an order for payment of a fine is made as a result of a citation under RCW 18.130.230 or a hearing under RCW 18.130.100 or 18.130.190 and timely payment is not made as directed in the final order, the disciplining authority may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county in which the hearing was held. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the disciplining authority may have as to any licensee ordered to pay a fine but shall not be construed to limit a licensee's ability to seek judicial review under RCW 18.130.140.

In any action for enforcement of an order of payment of a fine, the disciplining authority's order is conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment of a fine and the terms of payment.

[ 2008 c 134 s 23; 1993 c 367 s 20; 1987 c 150 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.